src/pronoun-smj-lex.txt
LEXICON goabbákcase
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Abe:a#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:a#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:a#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:a#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:a#tagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc:av K ;
 +Sg+Ill:ij K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:is K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:in K ;
 +Sg+Com:ijn K ;
 ållusacase ;
 
 
 LEXICON ållusacase
 +Pl+Nom:a K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ij K ;
 +Pl+Abe:ij#da K ;
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ij#dak K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ij#dagi K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ij#dagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ij#tagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc:ijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ijn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:ij K ;
 
LEXICON ienebusjcase
 +Sg+Nom:sj%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:ttja%> K ;
 +Sg+Abe:ttja%>#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>#tagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc:ttja%>v K ;
 +Sg+Ill:dtja%>j K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:ttja%>s K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:ttja%>n K ;
 +Sg+Com:ttja%>jn K ;
 +Ess:dtja%>n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:ttja%> K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ttja%>j K ;
 +Pl+Abe:ttja%>j#da K ;
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>j#dak K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>j#dagi K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>j#dagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>j#tagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc:ttja%>jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ttja%>jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ttja%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ttja%>js K ;
 +Pl+Com:ttja%>j K ;
 
LEXICON ienemuscase
 +Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:á%> K ;
 +Sg+Abe:á%>#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:á%>#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:á%>#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:á%>#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:á%>#tagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc:á%>v K ;
 +Sg+Ill:sa%>j K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:á%>s K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:á%>n K ;
 +Sg+Com:á%>jn K ;
 +Ess:sa%>n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:á%> K ;
 +Pl+Gen:á%>j K ;
 +Pl+Abe:á%>j#da K ;
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:á%>j#dak K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:á%>j#dagi K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:á%>j#dagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:á%>j#tagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc:á%>jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:á%>jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:á%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:á%>js K ;
 +Pl+Com:áj%> K ;
 
LEXICON enapcase
 +Sg+Nom:p%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:bu%> K ;
 +Sg+Abe:bu%>#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:bu%>#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:bu%>#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:bu%>#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:bu%>#tagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc:bu%>v K ;
 +Sg+Ill:bu%>j K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:bu%>s K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:bu%>n K ;
 +Sg+Com:bu%>jn K ;
 +Ess:bu%>n K ;
 ienebucase ;

LEXICON ienebucase
 +Pl+Nom:bu%> K ;
 +Pl+Gen:bu%>j K ;
 +Pl+Abe:bu%>j#da K ;
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:bu%>j#dak K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:bu%>j#dagi K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:bu%>j#dagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:bu%>j#tagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc:bu%>jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:bu%>jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:bu%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:bu%>js K ;
 +Pl+Com:buj%> K ;

LEXICON juohkkahasjcase
 +Sg+Nom:sj%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:ttja%> K ;
 +Sg+Abe:ttja%>#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>#tagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc:ttja%>v K ;
 +Sg+Ill:dtja%>j K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:ttja%>s K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:ttja%>n K ;
 +Sg+Com:ttja%>jn K ;
 +Ess:dtja%>n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:ttja%> K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ttja%>j K ;
 +Pl+Abe:ttja%>j#da K ;
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>j#dak K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>j#dagi K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>j#dagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ttja%>j#tagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc:ttja%>jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ttja%>jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ttja%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ttja%>js K ;
 +Pl+Com:ttja%>j K ;
 
LEXICON nubbecase
 +Sg+Gen:e%> K ;
 +Sg+Ine+Attr:e%> K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:e%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:e%> NAMÁK ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe:e%>#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:e%>#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:e%>#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:e%>#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:e%>#tagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc:e%>v K ;
 +Sg+Ela:e%>s K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:e%>n K ;
 +Sg+Com:i%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Nom:e%> K ;
 +Pl+Gen:i%>j K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:i%>j NAMÁK ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe:i%>j#da K ;
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:i%>j#dak K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:i%>j#dagi K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:i%>j#dagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:i%>j#tagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc:i%>jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:i%>jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:i%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:i%>js K ;
 +Pl+Com:i%>j K ;

LEXICON juobbácase
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Ine+Attr: K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Attr: K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG: NAMÁK ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe:#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:#tagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;
 +Sg+Ela:s K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Pl+Nom: K ;
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:j NAMÁK ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe:j#da K ;
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:j#dak K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:j#dagi K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:j#dagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:j#tagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;
 +Pl+Com:j K ;
 

LEXICON gallicase
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Ine+Attr: K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Attr: K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG: NAMÁK ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe:#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:#tagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Sg+Ela:s K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 
LEXICON goappásjcase
 +Sg+Nom:sj%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:tj%>a K ;
 +Sg+Abe:tj%>a#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>a#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>a#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>a#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>a#tagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc:tj%>av K ;
 +Sg+Ill:tj%>ij K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:tj%>as K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:tj%>an K ;
 +Sg+Com:tj%>ajn K ;
 +Ess:tj%>in K ;
 goappátjacase ;
 
LEXICON goappátjacase
 +Pl+Nom:tj%>a K ;
 +Pl+Gen:tj%>ij K ;
 +Pl+Abe:tj%>ij#da K ;
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>ij#dak K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>ij#dagi K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>ij#dagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:tj%>ij#tagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc:tj%>ijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:tj%>ijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:tj%>ijn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:tj%>ijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:tj%>ij K ;


LEXICON dimnacase
 +Attr: NAMÁK ;
 +Pl+Nom: K ;
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:j NAMÁK ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;
 +Pl+Com:j K ;

LEXICON divnnacase
 +Attr:na%> NAMÁK ;
 +Attr+Use/NG:na%> K ; ! 
 +Sg+Nom:na%> K ;
 +Sg+Acc:a%>v K ;
 +Pl+Nom:a%> K ;
 +Pl+Gen:a%>j K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:a%>j NAMÁK ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc:a%>jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:a%>jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:a%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:a%>js K ;
 +Pl+Com:a%>j K ;

LEXICON iind
 +Pron+Indef:%>0 K ;

LEXICON Demonstrative
dakkárasj+Pron+Dem:dakkára juohkkahasjcase ;
dakkirasj+Pron+Dem:dakkira juohkkahasjcase ;
dákkárasj+Pron+Dem:dákkára juohkkahasjcase ;
dákkirasj+Pron+Dem:dákkira juohkkahasjcase ;
dåkkárasj+Pron+Dem:dåkkára juohkkahasjcase ;
dåkkirasj+Pron+Dem:dåkkira juohkkahasjcase ;
duokkárasj+Pron+Dem:duokkára juohkkahasjcase ;
duokkirasj+Pron+Dem:duokkira juohkkahasjcase ;
LEXICON Indefinite
 vajku% guhtimusj+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:vajku% guhtimu ienebusjcase ; ! speller diehti
 vájk% guhtimusj+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:vájk% guhtimu ienebusjcase ; ! speller diehti
goabbák+Pron+Indef:goappág%> goabbákcase ;
ienebusj+Pron+Indef:ienebu ienebusjcase ;
ienemus+Pron+Indef:ienemus ienemuscase ;
enamus+Pron+Indef:enamus ienemuscase ;
enap+Pron+Indef:ena enapcase ;
ienep+Pron+Indef:iene enapcase ;
ienebu+Pron+Indef:iene ienebucase ; 
ålop+Pron+Indef:ålo enapcase ;
hármmat+Pron+Indef:hármmad%> goabbákcase ;
juohkkahasj+Pron+Indef:juohkkaha juohkkahasjcase ;
 juohkkehasj+Pron+Indef+Use/NG:juohkkeha juohkkahasjcase ; ! 
færttahasj+Pron+Indef:færttaha juohkkahasjcase ;
unnánasj+Pron+Indef:unnána juohkkahasjcase ;
 gájkkasasj+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:gájkkasa juohkkahasjcase ; !
færttasj+Pron+Indef:færtta goappásjcase ;
goappásj+Pron+Indef:goappá goappásjcase ;
goappátja+Pron+Indef:goappá goappátjacase ;
moattes+Pron+Indef:moaddás%> goabbákcase ;
ålos+Pron+Indef:ållus%> goabbákcase ;
ållusa+Pron+Indef:ållus%> ållusacase ;
nubbe+Pron+Indef:nupp nubbecase ;
juobbá+Pron+Indef:juoppá%> juobbácase ;
gallegis+Pron+Indef:gallegis ienemuscase ;
avtagasj+Pron+Indef:avtaga juohkkahasjcase ;
gallegasj+Pron+Indef:gallega juohkkahasjcase ;
vuostamusj+Pron+Indef:vuostamu ienebusjcase ;
dimna+Pron+Indef:dimna%> dimnacase ;
divnna+Pron+Indef:divn divnnacase ;
irda iind ;
gájk#divna iind ;
gájk#divnas iind ;
sæbbmi iind ;
sæmmi iind ;
sæmme iind ;
sæmmá iind ;
enas iind ;
ihkenis iind ;
åbbånis iind ;
åvvånis iind ;
sudes iind ;  
makkirak iind ;
makkirik iind ;
makkárak iind ;
makkárik iind ;
iesj#guhtik iind ;
juonenik iind ;
juokkirik iind ;
juokkirak iind ;
 juoppánik  iind ; !iness.
majduk iind ;
mejduk iind ;
mahku iind ;
aktas iind ;
guovtev iind ;
